Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 35.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [35.025] ANIMAL HEALTH ADVISORY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall protect the health of Minnesota domestic animals and carry out the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner shall make rules necessary to protect the health of domestic animals. On or before November 1 of each year, the commissioner shall publish an annual report. The University of Minnesota Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory is the official laboratory for the commissioner. At least quarterly, the director of the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory must report on the laboratory's activities. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must appoint eight members to the Animal Health Advisory Council: new text end new text begin (1) three of whom are producers of livestock in the state; new text end new text begin (2) one of whom is a member of a federally recognized Tribe located in Minnesota who is experienced in animal husbandry; new text end new text begin (3) one of whom is an epidemiologist; and new text end new text begin (4) three of whom are practicing veterinarians licensed in Minnesota, one of whom specializes in companion animals. new text end new text begin To the extent practicable, the governor's appointments must achieve gender and geographic balance among the board membership. new text end new text begin (c) The Animal Health Advisory Council must advise the commissioner in the administration of this chapter. The Animal Health Advisory Council shall meet at least quarterly. Notwithstanding section 15.014, the Animal Health Advisory Council does not expire. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin ABOLISHED; BOARD OF ANIMAL HEALTH.new text end new text begin The Board of Animal Health is abolished and its duties, as previously codified in Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 35.03, and is transferred to the commissioner pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 15.039. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must recodify the relevant sections in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 35, and Minnesota Rules, chapters 1700 to 1721, as necessary to conform with section 1. The revisor must also change the responsible agency, remove obsolete language, and make necessary cross-reference changes. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 35.01, subdivision 2; 35.02; and 35.03, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04459 35.01 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 2. Board; state board. "Board" or "state board" means the Board of Animal Health. 35.02 BOARD OF ANIMAL HEALTH. Subdivision 1. Members; officers. The board has seven members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, three of whom are producers of livestock in the state; one of whom is a member of a federally recognized Tribe located in Minnesota who is experienced in animal husbandry; and three of whom are practicing veterinarians licensed in Minnesota, one of whom specializes in companion animals. To the extent practicable, the governor's appointments must achieve gender and geographic balance among the board membership. The commissioners of agriculture, natural resources, and health, the dean of the College of Veterinary Medicine, and the director of the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory of the University of Minnesota may serve as consultants to the board without vote. Appointments to fill unexpired terms must be made from the classes to which the retiring members belong. The board shall elect a president and a vice-president from among its members and a veterinarian licensed in Minnesota who is not a member to be its executive director for a term of one year and until a successor qualifies. The board shall set the duties of the director. Subd. 2. Terms; compensation; removal; vacancies. The membership terms, compensation, removal of members, and filling of vacancies on the board are governed by section 15.0575. 35.03 POWERS, DUTIES, AND REPORTS. The board shall protect the health of Minnesota domestic animals and carry out the provisions of this chapter. The board shall make rules necessary to protect the health of domestic animals. The board shall meet at least quarterly. Officers must be elected each April. On or before November 1 of each year the board shall publish an annual report. The University of Minnesota Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory is the official laboratory for the board. At least quarterly, the director of the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory must report on the laboratory's activities.